Utah statutes.
61-2f-306.   Rights and privileges of real estate licensees to fill out forms or documents.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a real estate licensee may fill out only those legal forms approved by the commission and the attorney general, and those forms provided by statute.

(2) (a) (i)  A principal broker may fill out any documents associated with the closing of a real estate transaction.

(ii)  A branch broker or associate broker may fill out any documents associated with the closing of a real estate transaction if designated to fill out the documents by the principal broker with whom the branch broker or associate broker is affiliated.

(b)  A real estate licensee may fill out real estate forms prepared by legal counsel of the buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee.

(c)  If the commission and the attorney general have not approved a specific form for the transaction, a principal broker, associate broker, or sales agent may fill out real estate forms prepared by any legal counsel, including legal counsel retained by the brokerage to develop these forms.

(3)  The commission may by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, provide a process for the approval of a legal form under this section by the commission and the attorney general.

